Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.160

Mayor—Duties—Powers—Mayor pro tempore.

The mayor shall preside over all meetings of the council at which he or she is present. A mayor pro tempore may be chosen by the council for a specified period of time, not to exceed six months, to act as the mayor in the absence of the mayor. The mayor shall sign all warrants drawn on the treasurer and shall sign all written contracts entered into by the town. The mayor may administer oaths and affirmations, and take affidavits and certify them. The mayor shall sign all conveyances made by the town and all instruments which require the seal of the town.

The mayor is authorized to acknowledge the execution of all instruments executed by the town which require acknowledgment.

[ 1988 c 196 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.160. Prior: 1890 p 209 s 167; RRS s 9186.]